North Carolina, session 2025, HB439.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-269 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269. Carrying concealed weapons.
…
(d) This section does not apply to an ordinary pocket knife carried in a closed position.
As used in this section, "ordinary pocket knife" means a small knife, designed for carrying in a
pocket or purse, that has its cutting edge and point entirely enclosed by its handle, and that may
not be opened by a throwing, explosive, or spring action.
(e) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply if all of the following apply:
(1) The weapon is a knife.
(2) The person carrying the concealed knife is at least 18 years of age.
(3) The person carries valid identification at all times the person is carrying a
concealed knife and displays the identification upon demand by a law
enforcement officer.
(4) The person has not been convicted of a felony under the laws of this State,
another state, or the United States.
(5) The person is not a fugitive from justice.
(6) The person is not an unlawful user of or addicted to any controlled substance.
(7) The person has not been adjudicated as mentally defective and has not been
committed to any mental institution at 16 years of age or older.
(8) The person is not an alien, either illegally or unlawfully in the United States.
(9) The person has not been discharged from the Armed Forces under
dishonorable conditions.
(10) The person, having been a citizen of the United States, has not renounced his
or her citizenship.
(11) The person is not subject to a court order that restrains such person from
harassing, stalking, or threatening an intimate partner of such person or child
of such intimate partner or person, or engaging in other conduct that would
place an intimate partner in reasonable fear of bodily injury to the partner or
child.
(12) The person has not been convicted in any court of a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence.
*H439-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(13) The person is not carrying a concealed knife in or on a place where a concealed
handgun is prohibited from being carried under subsection (c) of
G.S. 14-415.11.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "knife" means (i) a bowie knife, (ii) a dirk, (iii) a
dagger, (iv) a switchblade, as that term is defined in G.S. 14-269.2, or (v) a bladed weapon of
like kind to the weapons described in this subsection."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 439-Second Edition